Florida, session 2026, SB1120.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 100 101 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of 102 subsection (1) of section 112.3261, Florida Statutes, are 103 redesignated as paragraphs (c), (d), and (e), respectively, a 104 new paragraph (b) is added to that subsection, subsection (9) is 105 added to that section, and subsection (7) of that section is 106 amended, to read: 107 112.3261âLobbying before water management districts; 108 registration and reporting.â 109 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 110 (b)ââExpenditureâ has the same meaning as in s. 112.3215. 111 (7)âUpon receipt of a sworn complaint alleging that a 112 lobbyist or principal has failed to register with a district, 113 has made a prohibited expenditure, or has knowingly submitted 114 false information in a report or registration required under 115 this section, the commission shall investigate a lobbyist or 116 principal pursuant to the procedures established under s. 117 112.324. The commission shall provide the Governor with a report 118 of its findings and recommendations in any investigation 119 conducted pursuant to this subsection. The Governor is 120 authorized to enforce the commissionâs findings and 121 recommendations. 122 (9)âNotwithstanding s. 112.3148, s. 112.3149, or any other 123 law, a lobbyist or principal may not make, directly or 124 indirectly, any expenditure, and a district governing board 125 member, an executive director, or any district employee who 126 qualifies as a local officer as defined in s. 112.3145(1) may 127 not knowingly accept, directly or indirectly, any expenditure. 128 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 373.0693, Florida 129 Statutes, is amended to read: 130 373.0693âBasins; basin boards.â 131 (1)(a)âAny areas within a district may be designated by the 132 district governing board as subdistricts or basins. The 133 designations of such basins must shall be made by the district 134 governing board by resolutions thereof. The governing board of 135 the district may change the boundaries of such basins, or create 136 new basins, by resolution. 137 (b)âNo subdistrict or basin in the St. Johns River Water 138 Management District other than established by this act shall 139 become effective until approved by the Legislature. 140 Section 3.âSubsection (7) of section 373.079, Florida 141 Statutes, is amended to read: 142 373.079âMembers of governing board; oath of office; staff.â 143 (7)âThe governing board shall meet at least once a month 144 and upon call of the chair. A quorum is necessary for the board 145 to conduct official business. A majority of the members of the 146 governing board, which includes both appointed members and 147 vacancies, constitutes a quorum. A board memberâs appearance at 148 a board meeting, whether such appearance is in person or through 149 the use of communications media technology, must be counted for 150 the determination of a quorum. Except where otherwise provided 151 by law, action may be taken by the governing board only upon an 152 affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the governing 153 board. The governing board, a basin board, a committee, or an 154 advisory board may conduct meetings by means of communications 155 media technology in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to s. 156 120.54(5)(b) s. 120.54. 157 Section 4.âSubsection (7) of section 373.470, Florida 158 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (8) is added to that 159 section, to read: 160 373.470âEverglades restoration.â 161 (7)âANNUAL REPORT.âTo provide enhanced oversight of and 162 accountability for the financial commitments established under 163 this section and the progress made in the implementation of the 164 comprehensive plan, the following information must be prepared 165 annually as part of the consolidated annual report required by 166 s. 373.036(7): 167 (a)âThe district, in cooperation with the department, shall 168 provide the following information as it relates to 169 implementation of the comprehensive plan: 170 1.âAn identification of funds, by source and amount, 171 received by the state and by each local sponsor during the 172 fiscal year. 173 2.âAn itemization of expenditures, by source and amount, 174 made by the state and by each local sponsor during the fiscal 175 year. 176 3.âA description of the purpose for which the funds were 177 expended. 178 4.âThe unencumbered balance of funds remaining in trust 179 funds or other accounts designated for implementation of the 180 comprehensive plan. 181 5.âA schedule of anticipated expenditures for the next 182 fiscal year. 183 (b)âThe department shall prepare a detailed report on all 184 funds expended by the state and credited toward the stateâs 185 share of funding for implementation of the comprehensive plan. 186 The report shall include: 187 1.âA description of all expenditures, by source and amount, 188 from the former Conservation and Recreation Lands Trust Fund, 189 the Land Acquisition Trust Fund, the former Preservation 2000 190 Trust Fund, the Florida Forever Trust Fund, the Save Our 191 Everglades Trust Fund, and other named funds or accounts for the 192 acquisition or construction of project components or other 193 features or facilities that benefit the comprehensive plan. 194 2.âA description of the purposes for which the funds were 195 expended. 196 3.âThe unencumbered fiscal-year-end balance that remains in 197 each trust fund or account identified in subparagraph 1. 198 (c)âThe district, in cooperation with the department, shall 199 provide a detailed report on progress made in the implementation 200 of the comprehensive plan, including the total estimated 201 remaining cost of implementation of the comprehensive plan. The 202 report must also include the status of and applicable 203 performance indicators for all project components. The project 204 components must be subdivided into the following categories 205 based on the projectâs status: 206 1.âPlanning and design phase. 207 2.âConstruction phase, for which the performance indicators 208 must include, but are not limited to: 209 a.âWhether the project is on time and on budget based on a 210 schedule performance index; and 211 b.âWhether the project had any claims, change orders, or 212 credits upon closeout, including the description, date, and cost 213 of the change, compensatory amounts, and the remedy or 214 resolution exercised as it pertains to the schedule or budget of 215 the project. 216 3.âOperational phase, for which the performance indicators 217 must include, but are not limited to, whether the operation of 218 the project is achieving the goals and objectives identified in 219 the final project implementation report. 220 4.âPending projects phase, which includes project 221 components that have not yet entered the planning or design 222 phase. 223 5.âThe estimated expenditures for the project in the prior 224 fiscal year compared to the actual expenditures, with an 225 explanation for significant variances initiated after the 226 effective date of this act or the date of the last report 227 prepared under this subsection, whichever is later. 228 (d)âFor a project or project component developed pursuant 229 to s. 255.065, the performance indicators in the report must be 230 consistent with national industry standards for the delivery 231 method. 232 233 The information required in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c), and 234 (d) must shall be provided as part of the consolidated annual 235 report required by s. 373.036(7). Each annual report is due by 236 March 1. 237 (8)âINTEGRATED DELIVERY SCHEDULE.âThe Legislature 238 recognizes the value of the integrated delivery schedule as a 239 forward-looking snapshot of upcoming planning, design, and 240 construction schedules for the comprehensive plan and as a tool 241 that provides information to decisionmakers and facilitates 242 achievement of the goals and purposes of the comprehensive plan 243 at the earliest possible time to the extent practical, given 244 funding, engineering, and other contractual constraints. The 245 Legislature further recognizes that the schedule acts as a 246 planning document and does not represent a budget or financial 247 commitment on behalf of any of the participants of the South 248 Florida Ecosystem Restoration Task Force. Therefore, when making 249 recommendations for any update to the schedule, state and local 250 members of the task force shall identify project funding sources 251 to reflect whether funding will use recurring state funds 252 provided pursuant to s. 375.041(3)(b)1., 4., and 5., or whether 253 the project may be funded with nonrecurring state funds. 254 Section 5.âSubsection (3) is added to section 373.501, 255 Florida Statutes, to read: 256 373.501âAppropriation of funds to water management 257 districts.â 258 (3)âA water management district may not use state funds as 259 a local match for any state grant program unless such funds have 260 been specifically appropriated to the district for such purpose. 261 Section 6.âSubsection (3) of section 373.503, Florida 262 Statutes, is amended to read: 263 373.503âManner of taxation.â 264 (3)(a)1.âThe districts may, by resolution adopted by a 265 majority vote of the governing board, levy ad valorem taxes on 266 property within the district solely for the purposes of this 267 chapter and of chapter 25270, 1949, Laws of Florida, as amended, 268 and chapter 61-691, Laws of Florida, as amended. If appropriate, 269 taxes levied by each governing board may be separated by the 270 governing board into a millage necessary for the purposes of the 271 district and a millage necessary for financing basin functions 272 specified in s. 373.0695. 273 2.a.âA district may levy separate ad valorem taxes on 274 property within the district or basin for the purposes of the 275 construction of capital improvement projects. Such levy must be 276 by resolution adopted by a majority vote of the districtâs 277 governing board and conditioned to take effect only upon 278 approval by a majority vote of the electors in the district or 279 basin, as applicable, voting in a referendum held at a general 280 election as defined in s. 97.021. The resolution must be 281 conditioned to take effect on the January 1 immediately 282 following voter approval of the referendum. The resolution must 283 include the millage to be levied, a detailed description of the 284 capital improvement projects to be funded by the millage, such 285 projectsâ expected dates of completion, and the maximum duration 286 for the levy of the millage, which may not extend beyond the 287 date that the projects are expected to be completed. The millage 288 levied under this subparagraph may be up to an amount that, when 289 combined with millage levied under subparagraph 1., does not 290 exceed the maximum total millage rate authorized under paragraph 291 (b). The referendum question on the ballot must specify a brief 292 and general description of the purpose of the levy and the 293 maximum length of time the millage may be imposed. 294 b.âFor purposes of this subparagraph, the term âcapital 295 improvement projectsâ means projects related to water supply, 296 including alternative water supply and water resource 297 development projects identified in the districtâs regional water 298 supply plans, water quality, flood protection and floodplain 299 management, and natural systems. 300 (b)(a)âNotwithstanding any other general or special law, 301 and subject to subsection (4), the maximum total millage rate 302 for all district and basin purposes authorized under this 303 section shall be: 304 1.âNorthwest Florida Water Management District: 0.05 mill. 305 2.âSuwannee River Water Management District: 0.75 mill. 306 3.âSt. Johns River Water Management District: 0.6 mill. 307 4.âSouthwest Florida Water Management District: 1.0 mill. 308 5.âSouth Florida Water Management District: 0.80 mill. 309 (c)(b)âThe apportionment of millages levied pursuant to 310 subparagraph (a)1. in the South Florida Water Management 311 District shall be a maximum of 40 percent for district purposes 312 and a maximum of 60 percent for basin purposes, respectively. 313 (d)(c)âWithin the Southwest Florida Water Management 314 District, the maximum millage assessed for district purposes may 315 not exceed 50 percent of the total authorized millage if there 316 are one or more basins in the district, and the maximum millage 317 assessed for basin purposes may not exceed 50 percent of the 318 total authorized millage. 319 Section 7.âSection 373.535, Florida Statutes, is amended to 320 read: 321 373.535âPreliminary district budgets.â 322 (1)âBUDGET DEVELOPMENT.â 323 (a)âBy January 15 of each year, each water management 324 district shall submit a preliminary budget for the next fiscal 325 year for legislative review to the President of the Senate, the 326 Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairs of each 327 legislative committee and subcommittee having substantive or 328 fiscal jurisdiction over water management districts, as 329 determined by the President of the Senate or the Speaker of the 330 House of Representatives, as applicable, in the form and manner 331 prescribed in s. 373.536(5)(e). 332 (b)âEach preliminary budget must also include: 333 1.âA section that clearly identifies and provides 334 justification for each proposed expenditure listed in s. 335 373.536(5)(e)4.e. and f. and identifies the source of funds for 336 each proposed expenditure. 337 2.âA section identifying the justification for proposed 338 expenditures by core mission area of responsibility and the 339 source of funds needed for activities related to water supply, 340 including alternative water supply and water resource 341 development projects identified in the districtâs regional water 342 supply plans, water quality, flood protection and floodplain 343 management, and natural systems. 344 3.âA section that includes the districtâs capital 345 improvement plan for the current fiscal year and the next fiscal 346 year, which will be incorporated as part of the districtâs 5 347 year capital improvement plan. The following information must be 348 included for each project contained in the capital improvement 349 plan: 350 a.âEstimated beginning and ending date. 351 b.âCurrent status, such as planning, construction, or 352 operations. 353 c.âFunding source, grouped by federal, state, and local 354 pursuant to s. 373.503(3)(a)1., local pursuant to s. 355 373.503(3)(a)2., or other. 356 d.âTotal cost of the project. 357 e.âWhether the project is funded from reserves. 358 f.âTotal expenditures made to date, by fiscal year. 359 g.âCurrent year estimated expenditures. 360 h.âAnnual budget, including future budget requests, until 361 project completion, by funding source. 362 i.âProject description. 363 j.âState program code, such as operations and maintenance 364 or ecosystems restoration. 365 4.3.âA section reviewing the adopted and proposed budget 366 allocations by program area and the performance metrics for the 367 prior year. 368 5.4.âAn analysis of each preliminary budget to determine 369 the adequacy of fiscal resources available to the district and 370 the adequacy of proposed district expenditures related to the 371 core mission areas of responsibility for water supply, including 372 alternative water supply and water resource development projects 373 identified in the districtâs regional water supply plans, water 374 quality, flood protection and floodplain management, and natural 375 systems. The analysis must be based on the particular needs 376 within each district for core mission areas of responsibility. 377 The water supply analysis must specifically include a 378 determination of the adequacy of each districtâs fiscal 379 resources provided in the districtâs preliminary budget to 380 achieve appropriate progress toward meeting the districtwide 20 381 year projected water supply demands, including funding for 382 alternative water supply development and conservation projects. 383 (c)(b)âIf applicable, the preliminary budget for each 384 district must specify that the districtâs first obligation for 385 payment is the debt service on bonds and certificates of 386 participation. 387 (d)âIn addition to the information that must be included 388 for projects carried out pursuant to the capital improvement 389 plan in subparagraph (b)3., the South Florida Water Management 390 District must include a separate section in its preliminary 391 budget for all projects within the Comprehensive Everglades 392 Restoration Plan. The information for the separate section must 393 be provided on a project-by-project basis and include the source 394 of funds. For each project, all of the following information 395 must be included: 396 1.âThe project title and a brief description. 397 2.âThe total estimated cost of the project, delineated by 398 federal and nonfederal sponsor obligations. The local sponsor 399 obligations must be further delineated by state and district 400 obligations. 401 3.âThe timeline for the project. 402 4.âThe total expenditures to date and estimated remaining 403 expenditures needed for project completion. 404 5.âThe estimate of expenditures for the current year. 405 6.âThe estimate of expenditures for the next fiscal year. 406 (e)âFor expenditures funded by state appropriations, the 407 South Florida Water Management District shall indicate which 408 fiscal year the appropriation is from. In estimating 409 expenditures for the next fiscal year, the district may 410 incorporate state revenues only in an amount up to the amount of 411 funds specifically provided in s. 375.041(3)(b)1., 4., and 5., 412 unless the district commits district revenues on a dollar-for 413 dollar basis for any amount over such amount specifically 414 provided. 415 (2)âLEGISLATIVE REVIEW.â 416 (a)âThe Legislature may annually review the preliminary 417 budget for each district, including, but not limited to, those 418 items listed in s. 373.536(5)(e)4.d.-f., specific to regulation, 419 outreach, management, and administration program areas. 420 (b)âOn or before March 1 of each year, the President of the 421 Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may 422 submit comments regarding the preliminary budget to the 423 districts, and provide a copy of the comments to the Executive 424 Office of the Governor. Each district shall respond to the 425 comments in writing on or before March 15 of each year to the 426 President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 427 Representatives, and the Executive Office of the Governor. 428 (c)âIf, following such review, the Legislature does not 429 take any action pursuant to s. 373.503 on or before July 1 of 430 each year, a water management district may proceed with budget 431 development as provided in subsection (3) and s. 373.536. 432 (3)âFUNDING AUTHORITY GRANTED.âEach district shall use the 433 preliminary budget as submitted pursuant to subsection (1), and 434 as may be amended by the district in response to review by the 435 Legislature pursuant to this section and s. 373.503, as the 436 basis for developing the tentative budget for the next fiscal 437 year as provided in s. 373.536(5). However, this subsection may 438 not be construed to impair any contractual obligations. 439 Section 8.âParagraphs (c) and (e) of subsection (5) of 440 section 373.536, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 441 373.536âDistrict budget and hearing thereon.â 442 (5)âTENTATIVE BUDGET CONTENTS AND SUBMISSION; REVIEW AND 443 APPROVAL.â 444 (c)âThe Legislative Budget Commission may reject any of the 445 following district budget proposals unless specifically 446 appropriated by the Legislature: 447 1.âA single purchase of land in excess of $10 million, 448 except for land exchanges. 449 2.âAny cumulative purchase of land during a single fiscal 450 year in excess of $50 million. 451 3.âAny issuance of debt on or after July 1, 2012. 452 4.âAny program expenditure expenditures as described in 453 sub-subparagraphs (e)4.e. and f. in excess of 15 percent of a 454 districtâs total annual budget. 455 5.âAny individual variance variances in a districtâs 456 tentative budget which is in excess of 25 percent from a 457 districtâs preliminary budget. 458 6.âAny individual portion of a districtâs tentative budget 459 funded with state appropriations. 460 7.âAny individual project in the districtâs 5-year capital 461 improvement plan, except for those projects fully funded with 462 revenues approved by voters pursuant to s. 373.503(3)(a)2.a. 463 464 Written disapproval of any provision in the tentative budget 465 must be received by the district at least 5 business days before 466 the final district budget adoption hearing conducted under s. 467 200.065(2)(d). If written disapproval is not received at least 5 468 business days before the final budget adoption hearing, the 469 governing board may proceed with final adoption. Any provision 470 rejected by the Executive Office of the Governor or the 471 Legislative Budget Commission may not be included in a 472 districtâs final budget and may not be acted upon through any 473 other means without the prior approval of the entity rejecting 474 the provision. 475 (e)âThe tentative budget must be based on the preliminary 476 budget as submitted to the Legislature, and as may be amended by 477 the district in response to review by the Legislature pursuant 478 to ss. 373.503 and 373.535, as the basis for developing the 479 tentative budget for the next fiscal year as provided in this 480 subsection; however, this subsection may not be construed to 481 impair any contractual obligations. The tentative budget, and 482 must set forth the proposed expenditures of the district, to 483 which may be added an amount to be held as reserve. The 484 tentative budget must include, but is not limited to, the 485 following information for the preceding fiscal year and the 486 current fiscal year, and the proposed amounts for the upcoming 487 fiscal year, in a standard format prescribed by the Executive 488 Office of the Governor, in consultation with the Legislature: 489 1.âThe estimated amount of funds remaining at the beginning 490 of the fiscal year which have been obligated for the payment of 491 outstanding commitments not yet completed. 492 2.âThe estimated amount of unobligated funds or net cash 493 balance on hand at the beginning of the fiscal year; an 494 accounting of the source, balance, and projected future use of 495 the unobligated funds; and the estimated amount of funds to be 496 raised by district taxes or received from other sources to meet 497 the requirements of the district. 498 3.âThe millage rates and the percentage increase above the 499 rolled-back rate, together with a summary of the reasons the 500 increase is required, and the percentage increase in taxable 501 value resulting from new construction within the district. 502 4.âThe salaries and benefits, expenses, operating capital 503 outlay, number of authorized positions, and other personal 504 services for the following program areas of the district: 505 a.âWater resource planning and monitoring; 506 b.âLand acquisition, restoration, and public works; 507 c.âOperation and maintenance of works and lands; 508 d.âRegulation; 509 e.âOutreach for which the information provided must contain 510 a full description and accounting of expenditures for water 511 resources education; public information and public relations, 512 including public service announcements and advertising in any 513 media; and lobbying activities related to local, regional, state 514 and federal governmental affairs, whether incurred by district 515 staff or through contractual services; and 516 f.âManagement and administration. 517 518 In addition to the program areas reported by all water 519 management districts, the South Florida Water Management 520 District shall include in its budget document separate sections 521 on all costs associated with the Everglades Construction Project 522 and the Comprehensive Everglades Restoration Plan, incorporating 523 the amount of state revenues appropriated for the fiscal year. 524 5.âThe total estimated amount in the district budget for 525 each area of responsibility listed in subparagraph 4. and for 526 water resource, water supply, and alternative water supply 527 development projects identified in the districtâs regional water 528 supply plans. 529 6.âA description of each new, expanded, reduced, or 530 eliminated program. 531 7.âThe funding sources, including, but not limited to, ad 532 valorem taxes, Surface Water Improvement and Management Program 533 funds, other state funds, federal funds, and user fees and 534 permit fees for each program area. 535 8.âThe water management districtâs capital improvement plan 536 for the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year, in the 537 same format as required in the preliminary budget. 538 Section 9.âSection 373.6075, Florida Statutes, is amended 539 to read: 540 373.6075âPurchases from contracts of other entities.â 541 (1)âA water management district may purchase commodities 542 and contractual services, excluding services subject to s. 543 287.055, from the purchasing contracts of special districts, 544 municipalities, counties, other political subdivisions, 545 educational institutions, other states, nonprofit entities, 546 purchasing cooperatives, or the Federal Government, which have 547 been procured pursuant to competitive bid, request for proposal, 548 request for qualification, competitive selection, or competitive 549 negotiation, and which are otherwise in compliance with general 550 law if the purchasing contract of the other entity is procured 551 by a process that meets the procurement requirements of the 552 water management district. 553 (2)âFor contractual services for the design, engineering, 554 or construction, or for any combination of the design, 555 engineering, or construction of capital improvement projects 556 with a total project cost estimated at $20 million or more, a 557 water management district shall give preference to the lowest 558 responsible and responsive bid, proposal, or reply that includes 559 proof of district-defined acceptable minimum work experience 560 within this state, project-specific payment and performance 561 bonds in amounts appropriate for the project contract amount, 562 and minimum warranty of 2 years beginning at substantial 563 completion, or that includes proof of a comparable financial 564 assurance mechanism, as defined by district rule. 565 (3)âFor the purpose of the competitive selection process in 566 s. 287.055(4) or procurement procedures in s. 255.065(3), a 567 water management district shall consider whether a bid, 568 proposal, or reply includes appropriate payment and performance 569 bonds, proof of a comparable financial assurance mechanism, as 570 defined by district rule, or documentation of all bond faults or 571 bond claims within the last 10 years, including all open and 572 closed claims and agreed-upon amounts with a description of the 573 claim and any resolution. 574 Section 10.âParagraphs (a), (c), (d), (e), and (h) of 575 subsection (5) of section 380.093, Florida Statutes, are amended 576 to read: 577 380.093âResilient Florida Grant Program; comprehensive 578 statewide flood vulnerability and sea level rise data set and 579 assessment; Statewide Flooding and Sea Level Rise Resilience 580 Plan; regional resilience entities.â 581 (5)âSTATEWIDE FLOODING AND SEA LEVEL RISE RESILIENCE PLAN.â 582 (a)âBy December 1 of each year, the department shall 583 develop a Statewide Flooding and Sea Level Rise Resilience Plan 584 on a 3-year planning horizon and submit it to the Governor, the 585 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 586 Representatives. The plan must consist of ranked projects that 587 address risks of flooding and sea level rise to coastal and 588 inland communities in the state. All eligible projects submitted 589 to the department pursuant to this section must be ranked and 590 included in the plan. All eligible projects submitted by a water 591 management district must be ranked on a separate list. Each plan 592 must include a detailed narrative overview describing how the 593 plan was developed, including a description of the methodology 594 used by the department to determine project eligibility, a 595 description of the methodology used to rank projects, the 596 specific scoring system used, the project proposal application 597 form, a copy of each submitted project proposal application form 598 separated by eligible projects and ineligible projects, the 599 total number of project proposals received and deemed eligible, 600 the total funding requested, and the total funding requested for 601 eligible projects. 602 (c)âEach plan submitted by the department pursuant to this 603 subsection must include all of the following information for 604 each recommended project: 605 1.âA description of the project. 606 2.âThe location of the project. 607 3.âAn estimate of how long the project will take to 608 complete. 609 4.âAn estimate of the cost of the project. 610 5.âThe cost-share percentage available for the project, if 611 applicable. 612 6.âA summary of the priority score assigned to the project. 613 7.âThe project sponsor. 614 (d)1.âBy September 1 of each year, all of the following 615 entities may submit to the department a list of proposed 616 projects that address risks of flooding or sea level rise 617 identified in the comprehensive statewide flood vulnerability 618 and sea level rise assessment or vulnerability assessments that 619 meet the requirements of subsection (3): 620 a.âCounties. 621 b.âMunicipalities. 622 c.âSpecial districts as defined in s. 189.012 which are 623 responsible for the management and maintenance of inlets and 624 intracoastal waterways or for the operation and maintenance of a 625 potable water facility, a wastewater facility, an airport, or a 626 seaport facility. 627 d.âRegional resilience entities acting on behalf of one or 628 more member counties or municipalities. 629 630 For the plans submitted by December 1, 2024, such entities may 631 submit projects identified in existing vulnerability assessments 632 that do not comply with subsection (3) only if the entity is 633 actively developing a vulnerability assessment that is either 634 under a signed grant agreement with the department pursuant to 635 subsection (3) or funded by another state or federal agency, or 636 is self-funded and intended to meet the requirements of 637 paragraph (3)(d) or if the existing vulnerability assessment was 638 completed using previously compliant statutory requirements. 639 Projects identified from this category of vulnerability 640 assessments will be eligible for submittal until the prior 641 vulnerability assessment has been updated to meet most recent 642 statutory requirements. 643 2.âBy September 1 of each year, all of the following 644 entities may submit to the department a list of any proposed 645 projects that address risks of flooding or sea level rise 646 identified in the comprehensive statewide flood vulnerability 647 and sea level rise assessment or vulnerability assessments that 648 meet the requirements of subsection (3), or that mitigate the 649 risks of flooding or sea level rise on water supplies or water 650 resources of the state and a corresponding evaluation of each 651 project: 652 a.âWater management districts. 653 b.âDrainage districts. 654 c.âErosion control districts. 655 d.âFlood control districts. 656 e.âRegional water supply authorities. 657 3.âEach project submitted to the department pursuant to 658 this paragraph for consideration by the department for inclusion 659 in the plan must include all of the following information: 660 a.âA description of the project. 661 b.âThe location of the project. 662 c.âAn estimate of how long the project will take to 663 complete. 664 d.âAn estimate of the cost of the project. 665 e.âThe cost-share percentage available for the project, if 666 applicable. 667 f.âThe project sponsor. 668 (e)âEach project included in the plan must have a minimum 669 50 percent cost share unless the project assists or is within a 670 community eligible for a reduced cost share. For purposes of 671 this section, the term âcommunity eligible for a reduced cost 672 shareâ means: 673 1.âA municipality that has a population of 10,000 or less 674 fewer, according to the most recent April 1 population estimates 675 posted on the Office of Economic and Demographic Researchâs 676 website, and a per capita annual income that is less than the 677 stateâs per capita annual income as shown in the most recent 678 release from the Bureau of the Census of the United States 679 Department of Commerce that includes both measurements; 680 2.âA county that has a population of 50,000 or less fewer, 681 according to the most recent April 1 population estimates posted 682 on the Office of Economic and Demographic Researchâs website, 683 and a per capita annual income that is less than the stateâs per 684 capita annual income as shown in the most recent release from 685 the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of 686 Commerce that includes both measurements; or 687 3.âA municipality or county that has a per capita annual 688 income that is equal to or less than 75 percent of the stateâs 689 per capita annual income as shown in the most recent release 690 from the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of 691 Commerce. 692 (h)âThe total amount of funding proposed for each year of 693 the plan must may not be at least less than $100 million. No 694 more than 25 percent of the total amount proposed may fund 695 projects submitted by water management districts. Upon review 696 and subject to appropriation, the Legislature shall approve 697 funding for the projects as specified in the plan. Multiyear 698 projects that receive funding for the first year of the project 699 must be included in subsequent plans and funded until the 700 project is complete, provided that the project sponsor has 701 complied with all contractual obligations and funds are 702 available. 703 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 704 made by this act to section 373.503, Florida Statutes, in a 705 reference thereto, section 373.0697, Florida Statutes, is 706 reenacted to read: 707 373.0697âBasin taxes.âThe respective basins may, pursuant 708 to s. 9(b), Art. VII of the State Constitution, by resolution 709 request the governing board of the district to levy ad valorem 710 taxes within such basin. Upon receipt of such request, a basin 711 tax levy shall be made by the governing board of the district to 712 finance basin functions enumerated in s. 373.0695, 713 notwithstanding the provisions of any other general or special 714 law to the contrary, and subject to the provisions of s. 715 373.503(3). 716 (1)âThe amount of money to be raised by said tax levy shall 717 be determined by the adoption of an annual budget by the 718 district board of governors, and the average millage for the 719 basin shall be that amount required to raise the amount called 720 for by the annual budget when applied to the total assessment of 721 the basin as determined for county taxing purposes. However, no 722 such tax shall be levied within the basin unless and until the 723 annual budget and required tax levy shall have been approved by 724 formal action of the basin board, and no county in the district 725 shall be taxed under this provision at a rate to exceed 1 mill. 726 (2)âThe taxes provided for in this section shall be 727 extended by the county property appraiser on the county tax roll 728 in each county within, or partly within, the basin and shall be 729 collected by the tax collector in the same manner and time as 730 county taxes, and the proceeds therefrom paid to the district 731 for basin purposes. Said taxes shall be a lien, until paid, on 732 the property against which assessed and enforceable in like 733 manner as county taxes. The property appraisers, tax collectors, 734 and clerks of the circuit court of the respective counties shall 735 be entitled to compensation for services performed in connection 736 with such taxes at the same rates as apply to county taxes. 737 (3)âIt is hereby determined that the taxes authorized by 738 this subsection are in proportion to the benefits to be derived 739 by the several parcels of real estate within the basin from the 740 works authorized herein. 741 Section 12.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.